Maine, session 132, LD717.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §2002, sub-§3, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 296, §1, is
further amended to read:
B. "Critical investigation expense" means a necessary expense incurred by a
government or by a victim while investigating or prosecuting suspected criminal
conduct. "Critical investigation expense" is limited to the cost of an audit or other
financial analysis when that analysis is necessary to determine whether and to what
extent a victim has suffered financial harm from criminal conduct by an employee or
other person in a position of trust and the cost of analysis of suspected illegal drugs if
the defendant is convicted of trafficking a scheduled drug under chapter 45 and the
court in sentencing the defendant makes a finding that the conduct underlying the
conviction was motivated by profit.